Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3130
Representation as a psychologist; unlawful practice; violation; penalty.

(1) It shall be a violation of the Psychology Practice Act for any person not licensed in accordance with the act to represent himself or herself as a psychologist. It shall be a violation of the act for any person not licensed in accordance with the act to engage in the practice of psychology whether practicing as an individual, firm, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, agency, or other entity.

(2) Any person who represents himself or herself as a psychologist in violation of the act or who engages in the practice of psychology in violation of the act shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor. Each day of violation shall constitute a separate offense.

(3) Any person filing or attempting to file, as his or her own, a diploma or license of another or a forged affidavit of identification shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 89;

Laws 1999, LB 366, § 14;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,206.27;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1064.